Utah statutes.
54-8-12.   Property owners failing to appear at hearings -- Waiver of rights.

Every person who has real property within the boundaries of the district and who fails to appear before the governing body at the hearing and make any objection he may have to the creation of the district, the making of the improvements and the inclusion of his real property in the district, shall be deemed to have waived every such objection. Such waiver shall not, however, preclude his right to object to the amount of the assessment at the hearing for which provision is made in Section 54-8-17.



Enacted by Chapter 157, 1969 General Session

